Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 2

Liability of Sports Officials

62-50-201. “Sports official.”

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “sports official” means any person who serves as referee, umpire, linesperson or in any similar capacity in supervising or administering a sports event and who is registered as a member of a local, state, regional or national organization that provides training and educational opportunities for sports officials.

Acts 1989, ch. 90, § 1.

62-50-202. Immunity from civil liability.

A sports official who administers or supervises a sports event at any level of competition is not liable to any person or entity in any civil action for damages to a player, participant or spectator as a result of the sports official's act of commission or omission arising out of the sports official's duties or activities.

Acts 1989, ch. 90, § 2.

62-50-203. Intentional conduct or gross negligence.

Nothing in this part grants civil immunity to a sports official who intentionally or by gross negligence inflicts injury or damage to a person or entity.

Acts 1989, ch. 90, § 3.